Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-162
Inclusion of lands; notice; advance cost of proceeding, by whom paid.

The secretary of the board of directors shall cause notice of the filing of such petition to be given and published in the same manner and for the same time that notices of special elections for the issuance of bonds are required by section 46-194 to be published. The notice shall state the filing of such petition and the names of the petitioner, a description of the lands mentioned in the petition, and the prayers of the petition; and it shall notify all persons interested, or that may be affected by such change of the boundaries of the district, to appear at the office of the board at a time named in the notice, and show cause, in writing, if any they have, why the change in the boundaries of the district as proposed in the petition should not be made. The time to be specified in the notice at which they shall be required to show cause shall be the regular meeting of the board next after the expiration of the time for the publication of the notice. The petitioner shall advance to the secretary sufficient money to pay the estimated cost of all proceedings under sections 46-161 to 46-173.

Laws 1895, c. 70, § 35, p. 291;

R.S.1913, § 3493;

C.S.1922, § 2893;

C.S.1929, § 46-138;

R.S.1943, § 46-162.